Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Civil Actions in Circuit Courts

452.010.
Grounds for change of venue.

The parties to any civil action in a Circuit Court may, by consent, have an order in or out of court for its removal to any other Circuit Court.

A party to any civil action triable by a jury in a Circuit Court may have a change of venue when it appears that, because of the undue influence of his adversary or the odium that attends the party applying or his cause of action or defense, or because of the circumstances or nature of the case he cannot have a fair and impartial trial in the county.

History.

1094: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 229, § 1.

452.020.
Notice to adverse party.

Before an order for a change of venue is made, ten (10) days’ notice shall be given to the adverse party. The notice shall be served and filed as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

1095: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 52, effective July 1, 1953.

452.030.
Application for change of venue — Hearing — Witnesses — Decision.

Application for a change of venue shall be made by verified motion of the party seeking a change to the court, in which the reasons and grounds for the change shall be stated. On any motion for change of venue the court shall have a hearing for the presentation of evidence and arguments for and against the motion. Either party may subpoena witnesses for the hearing on the motion. The granting of a change of venue shall be within the sound discretion of the court, and shall be granted by the court when justice so requires.

History.

1096: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 229, § 2.

452.040.
Not more than one change of venue allowed each party.

Not more than one (1) change of venue or application for a change of venue shall be allowed to any party in the same civil action.

History.

1102.

452.050.
Order changing venue — To what county.

A change of venue shall be made to the Circuit Court of the adjacent county most convenient to the parties, their witnesses and their attorneys, and to which there is no valid objection. The order of change of venue may be made subject to any equitable terms and conditions that safety to the rights of the parties requires and the court, in its discretion, prescribes.

History.

1097.

452.060.
Transfer of papers on change of venue.

Immediately on the making or receipt of the order, the circuit clerk shall make out a transcript of the orders pertaining to the case, which, together with the original papers, he shall, as soon as practicable, carry or send by some discreet person to the clerk of the court to which the action is removed. The former circuit clerk shall be responsible for the conduct of the person so employed.

History.

1099.

452.070.
Order void unless expense of removal paid in ten (10) days.

The order of change of venue shall be void unless within ten (10) days the party obtaining the order pays to the clerk ten cents ($0.10) a mile for the expense of travel, going and returning, in making the removal.

History.

1098.

452.080.
When removed case stands for trial.

Upon receipt of the paper the receiving clerk shall note the action of record, and the action shall proceed as if the last pleading, motion or order was made on the date of such notation.

History.

1100: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 53, effective July 1, 1953.

452.090.
Power of court to which action removed.

The court to which the action is removed shall have the same power as to its trial and final disposition as the court from which it was removed.

History.

1101.

452.100.
Application at appearance term; continuance. [Repealed.]

452.105.
Transfer of case on party’s motion upon determination of improper venue.

In civil actions, when the judge of the court in which the case was filed determines that the court lacks venue to try the case due to an improper venue, the judge, upon motion of a party, shall transfer the case to the court with the proper venue.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 420, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

452.110.
Application of KRS 452.010 to 452.090.

KRS

452.010

to

452.090

apply only to civil actions in Circuit and District Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 465, effective January 2, 1978.

452.160.
Change of venue from county or quarterly court to circuit court, how governed. [Repealed.]

452.170.
Transfer of papers on change of venue — Remanding of papers. [Repealed.]

452.180.
Change of venue from justice’s court or police court. [Repealed.]